Maine, session 132, LD1932.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §282, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. GG, §3, is
amended to read:
10. Economic projections. To prepare long-range economic projections to ensure
that projected available state financial resources are commensurate with projected state
expenditures needed to meet long-term state economic goals and policies; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §282, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2021, c. 717, §3, is further
amended to read:
11. Economic and demographic analyses. To conduct studies and continuing
economic and demographic analyses of the state economy, including economic and
demographic forecasting, and collect, collate and analyze all pertinent data and statistics
relating to those studies and analyses to assist the Governor, the Legislature and the various
state departments in formulating goals, programs and policies. The commissioner shall
make these data and statistics available to the Legislature upon request. All state agencies
shall cooperate with the commissioner regarding implementation of the provisions of this
subsection. In implementing this subsection, the commissioner may use secondary data
made available to the commissioner by other state agencies or other organizations.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §282, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Biennial funding comparison report. To report to the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters, by January
15, 2026 and every 2 years thereafter, the total biennial cost to the State for all approved
services under the MaineCare program and state-funded programs provided by essential
support workers as defined in Title 22, section 7401, subsection 3. The report must include
the total projected cost if all such approved services were provided to the individuals who
qualify for the services and forecast anticipated costs in the future with projected
demographic changes.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §7402, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 398, Pt. AAAA, §1, is amended
to read:
§7402. Essential support worker reimbursement
Services provided by essential support workers that are reimbursed by the department
under the MaineCare program or another state-funded program must include in the
reimbursement rate the following:
1. At least 125% 140% of the minimum wage. An amount equal to at least 125%
140% of the minimum wage established in Title 26, section 664, subsection 1 for the labor
portion of the reimbursement rate. An increase to the minimum wage must be applied to
the reimbursement rate at within 6 months of the time the increase takes place; and
2. Taxes and benefits. An amount necessary to reimburse the provider for taxes and
benefits paid or costs incurred by the provider that are directly related to the reimbursed
wage increase in subsection 1. This amount must be adjusted whenever an increase to the
minimum wage is applied to the reimbursement rate under subsection 1.
3. Effective date. This section takes effect January 1, 2022.
Page 1 - 132LR1742(01)

Essential support workers providing services reimbursed by the department under the
MaineCare program or another state-funded program must be paid at least 125% of the
minimum wage established in Title 26, section 664, subsection 1.
Sec. 5. 26 MRSA §3802, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 688, §2 and reallocated
by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §98, is amended to read:
2. Membership. The advisory committee consists of 14 16 members, appointed as
follows:
A. One member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
B. One member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
C. The Commissioner of Health and Human Services or the commissioner's designee;
D. The Commissioner of Labor or the commissioner's designee;
E. One member representing an organization providing services to persons with
intellectual disabilities and autism who is a member of a statewide association of
providers of services to persons with intellectual disabilities and autism, appointed by
the President of the Senate;
F. One member representing a facility-based long-term care provider who is a member
of a statewide association of facility-based long-term care providers, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
G. One member representing a service coordination agency for people receiving home-
based and community-based long-term care, appointed by the President of the Senate;
H. One member representing an organization providing statewide homemaker services
through a state-funded, independent, support service program, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
I. One member representing an institution of higher education engaged in workforce
development, appointed by the President of the Senate;
J. One member representing a career and technical education center or region,
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
K. One member representing an organization promoting independent living for
persons with disabilities, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
L. One member who is an essential support worker, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
M. One member representing a statewide advocacy association that broadly advocates
for people who are entitled to receive essential support worker services, appointed by
the Speaker of the House; and
N. One member representing an organization providing services to persons with
behavioral health challenges who is a member of a statewide association of providers
of services to persons with behavioral health challenges, appointed by the Speaker of
the House.;
O. One member representing an organization providing personal care services in a
home setting, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
Page 2 - 132LR1742(01)

P. One member representing the long-term care ombudsman program established
under Title 22, section 5106, subsection 11-C and Title 22, section 5107-A.
Sec. 6. Biennial funding report. The report required by the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, section 282, subsection 12 must include services provided under the
MaineCare program or state-funded programs in the Department of Health and Human
Services rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Sections 12, 13, 17,
18, 19, 20, 21, 23, 28, 29, 50, 65, 67, 92, 96 and 97 and the Department of Health and
Human Services, Office of Aging and Disability Services rule Chapter 5: Office of Aging
and Disability Services Policy Manual, Sections 63 and 69.
Sec. 7. Maine Health Data Organization data inventory development. The
Maine Health Data Organization established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22,
chapter 1683, referred to in this section as "the organization," shall consult with the
Essential Support Workforce Advisory Committee established in Title 26, section 3802 and
the Department of Health and Human Services to develop a methodology for establishing
a baseline report on the care gap for MaineCare and state-funded services. The
organization shall identify the currently available data sources and the data gaps that are
barriers to creating a uniform data collection and reporting system along with options for
methods to gather the missing data and the associated costs. For the purposes of this
section, "care gap" is defined as the difference between the number of individuals who are
approved for services under the MaineCare program or state funded programs in the
department's rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Sections 12, 13,
17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 23, 28, 29, 50, 65, 67, 92, 96 and 97 and the department's Office of
Aging and Disability Services rule Chapter 5: Office of Aging and Disability Services
Policy Manual, Sections 63 and 69 but who are not receiving care because of the State's
direct care workforce shortage. No later than January 15, 2026, the organization shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
health and human services matters with its findings and recommendations relating to
available data sources and potential solutions for existing data gaps along with associated
costs to create a report that would establish a baseline care gap that could be used for
ongoing data collection, tracking and reporting. The joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters is authorized to
report out legislation relating to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
Legislature.
Sec. 8. Innovations in Care and Support Technology Plan. The Department
of Health and Human Services shall convene a stakeholder group to develop the
Innovations in Care and Support Technology Plan, referred to in this section as "the plan,"
no later than October 15, 2026. The plan must be developed to advance the use of
technology to reduce the number of unstaffed essential support worker hours due to staffing
shortages. The department shall identify a current staff person within the department as
the lead for the stakeholder group.
1. Membership. The stakeholder group must include, but is not limited to, the
following:
A. Members of the Essential Support Workforce Advisory Committee established in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 3802;
B. Representatives from provider agencies;
Page 3 - 132LR1742(01)

C. Family caregivers;
D. Clients receiving essential support worker services funded by the MaineCare
program or other state-funded programs;
E. Representatives with expertise in digital health and assistive technology; and
F. Representatives of the department within the Office of Aging and Disability
Services, the Office of MaineCare Services and the Office of Behavioral Health.
2. Plan requirements. The plan must include the following:
A. An inventory of current available and effective technologies, the results of Maine's
innovation grant projects, promising initiatives being tested and implemented in other
states and a review of available federal and private resources and policies;
B. The development of a set of empirical and achievable goals to promote the use of
supportive technologies to assist the existing essential support worker workforce, to expand
assistive technology and to manage the health and well-being of individuals who are not
receiving all the hours of assistance for which they are approved;
C. An implementation map with a timeline and milestones; and
D. Identification of any necessary legislation, rulemaking or funding for the plan.
3. Report. The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a copy of the
plan to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and
human services matters.
Sec. 9. Credentialing and training redesign. The Department of Health and
Human Services shall create a stakeholder group to assist the department in developing a
5-year plan, referred to in this section as "the plan," to expand its worker portability and
advancement initiative. The purpose of the plan is to establish a standardized curricula and
training program for all essential support workers as defined in the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 22, section 7401, subsection 3, including college credit courses, stackable credentials
and alignment with certifications and MaineCare reimbursement rates in a manner that
builds on the department's worker portability and advancement initiative. The plan must
also include a structure for ongoing evaluation and improvement of established curricula
and training programs.
1. Membership. The stakeholder group must include, but is not limited to:
A. Representatives from the Office of Aging and Disability Services, the Office of
MaineCare Services and the Division of Licensing and Certification;
B. A representative from the State Board of Nursing;
C. A representative from the Department of Labor;
D. Representatives from institutions of higher education including the University of
New England, College of Osteopathic Medicine, AgingME Geriatrics Workforce
Enhancement Program, 2nd round; the University of Southern Maine, Muskie School
of Public Service; and the Maine Community College System, Harold Alfond Center
for the Advancement of Maine's Workforce;
Page 4 - 132LR1742(01)

E. Members of Maine's Essential Care and Support Workforce Partnership who
represent or are affiliated with employers of essential support workers as defined in
Title 22, section 7401, subsection 3;
F. Members of the Direct Care and Support Professional Advisory Council, within the
long-term care ombudsman program under Title 22, section 5107-A; and
G. Clients, or guardians or family members of clients, receiving essential support
worker services funded by the MaineCare program or state-funded programs.
2. Plan requirements. The plan must include:
A. The development of a set of empirical and achievable steps to implement the plan;
B. An inventory of current and planned curricula and training initiatives targeting
essential support workers;
C. An implementation map with a timeline and milestones; and
D. Identification of any necessary legislation, rulemaking and funding required to
implement the plan.
3. Report. No later than October 15, 2026, the department shall submit a report with
the plan to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health
and human services matters and the Essential Support Workforce Advisory Committee
established in Title 26, section 3802. The joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over health and human services matters is authorized to report out
legislation to the 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. 10. Effective date. That section of this Act that amends the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 7402 takes effect January 1, 2026.